District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-939

Penalties — Spreading false reports about management or finances.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 490, ch. 397, § 39
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 448(d), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-939.
1981 Ed., § 29-1139.
1973 Ed., § 29-839.